South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3850.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Responsible Library Funding and Child Protection Act." SECTION 2.  Chapter 9, Title 60 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 60-9-15. County libraries must certify to the State Library that they do not offer any books or materials that appeal to the prurient interest of children under the age of seventeen in children, youth, or teen book sections of libraries and are only made available with explicit parental consent. Each county library must recertify this information quarterly each time it is to receive such funds, and the State Library shall confirm receipt of this recertification before it may disburse funds to a library. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----